Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.020

Local government license and permit requirements—Exemptions from chapter.

(1) A municipality or county may not enact an order, ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to obtain a fire sprinkler contractor license from the municipality or county. However, a municipality or county may require a fire protection sprinkler system contractor to obtain a permit and pay a fee for the installation of a fire protection sprinkler system and require the installation of such systems to conform with the building code or other construction requirements of the municipality or county, but may not impose financial responsibility requirements other than proof of a valid license.

(2) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) United States, state, and local government employees, building officials, fire marshals, fire inspectors, or insurance inspectors when acting in their official capacities;

(b) A person or organization acting under court order;

(c) A person or organization that sells or supplies products or materials to a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor;

(d) A registered professional engineer acting solely in a professional capacity;

(e) An employee of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor performing duties for the registered fire protection sprinkler system contractor; and

(f) An owner/occupier of a single-family residence performing his or her own installation in that residence.

[ 1990 c 177 s 3.]